Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB312.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 70.280 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A certified court security officer shall be charged with the following duties:
(a) Attending sessions of any court of the Court of Justice in the county in which
he or she is sworn;
(b) Keeping order in the courts;
(c) Providing security services to the courts within the court facility or immediate
area of the court facility;
(d) Guarding prisoners during court appearances;
(e) Serving warrants and other court papers on individuals physically present in
the courtroom or in the court facility;
(f) Transporting prisoners or other individuals being detained or in custody as
ordered by the court;
(g) Arresting and taking individuals into custody who are in the court facility or
immediate area of the court facility, or while transporting, monitoring, or
supervising prisoners or other individuals ordered transported by the court;
and
(h) Service of process and other papers relating to civil matters on individuals
physically present in the courtroom or in the court facility.
(2) A certified court security officer shall not:
(a) Go outside the immediate area of the court facility in which he or she is
providing security services to make an arrest or take an individual into
custody, except as provided in subsection (1) of this section[when
transporting prisoners];
(b) Patrol the roads, streets, or highways;
(c) Issue traffic citations, except to enforce parking regulations around the court
Page 1 of 4
BR145500.100 - 1455 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1455
facility; or
(d) Perform general law enforcement duties outside that of providing court
security.
Section 2. KRS 202A.028 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Following an examination by a qualified mental health professional and a
certification by that professional that the person meets the criteria for involuntary
hospitalization, a judge may order the person hospitalized for a period not to exceed
seventy-two (72) hours, excluding weekends and holidays. For the purposes of this
section, the qualified mental health professional shall be:
(a) A staff member of a regional community program for mental health or
individuals with an intellectual disability;
(b) An individual qualified and licensed to perform the examination through the
use of telehealth services; or
(c) The psychiatrist ordered, subject to the court's discretion, to perform the
required examination.
(2) Any person who has been admitted to a hospital under subsection (1) of this section
shall be released from the hospital within seventy-two (72) hours, excluding
weekends and holidays, unless further held under the applicable provisions of this
chapter.
(3) Any person admitted to a hospital under subsection (1) of this section or transferred
to a hospital while ordered hospitalized under subsection (1) of this section shall be
transported from the person's home county by the sheriff of that county, certified
court security officer, or other peace officer as ordered by the court. The sheriff or
other peace officer may, upon agreement of a person authorized by the peace
officer, authorize the cabinet, a private agency on contract with the cabinet, or an
ambulance service designated by the cabinet to transport the person to the hospital.
The transportation costs of the sheriff, certified court security officer, other peace
Page 2 of 4
BR145500.100 - 1455 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1455
officer, ambulance service, or other private agency on contract with the cabinet
shall be paid by the cabinet in accordance with an administrative regulation
promulgated by the cabinet[,] in accordance with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A.
(4) Any person released from the hospital under subsection (2) of this section shall be
transported to the person's county of discharge by a sheriff, certified court security
officer, or other peace officer, by an ambulance service designated by the cabinet,
or by other appropriate means of transportation which is consistent with the
treatment plan of that person. The transportation cost of transporting the patient to
the patient's county of discharge when performed by a sheriff, certified court
security officer, peace officer, ambulance service, or other private agency on
contract with the cabinet shall be paid by the cabinet in accordance with an
administrative regulation promulgated[issued] by the cabinet in accordance
with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A.
(5) A[No] person who has been held under subsection (1) of this section shall not be
held in jail pending evaluation and transportation to the hospital.
Section 3. KRS 202A.101 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The court which orders any person to the receiving hospital or psychiatric facility,
under the provisions of this chapter, shall immediately[at once] notify the receiving
hospital or psychiatric facility that the[such] order has been made, advising of the
sex and condition of the person.
(2) After the facility has been[ so] notified of the order, the court shall order the sheriff
of the county or other peace officer to transport the patient within forty-eight (48)
hours, [(]excluding weekends and holidays,[)] from the county in which the person
is located to the hospital or psychiatric facility designated by the cabinet. The
sheriff or other peace officer may, upon agreement of a person authorized by the
peace officer, authorize the cabinet, a private agency on contract with the cabinet,
or an ambulance service designated by the cabinet to transport the person to the
Page 3 of 4
BR145500.100 - 1455 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1455
hospital.
(3) The transportation costs of transporting a person to a hospital or psychiatric facility,
when performed by a sheriff, certified court security officer, peace officer, an
ambulance service, or other private agency on contract with the cabinet shall be
paid by the cabinet in accordance with an administrative regulation promulgated by
the cabinet in accordance with[under the provisions of] KRS Chapter 13A.
(4) In returning any patient to the county from which the patient is sent, the
transportation cost of the sheriff, certified court security officer,[ or] other peace
officer, the ambulance service, or the other agency on contract with the cabinet
transporting the patient shall be paid as provided in KRS 202A.028(4), when
necessary.
(5) Whenever an individual is involuntarily hospitalized by a court order, the patient
shall be transported to the hospital designated by the cabinet and accompanied by
the following documents:
(a) A copy of the petition for involuntary hospitalization, unless hospitalization
takes place pursuant to KRS 202A.041;
(b) The certificate of qualified mental health professionals; and
(c) The order of involuntary hospitalization.
(6) The hospital may refuse to receive any person who has been ordered to be
involuntarily hospitalized by a court order if the papers presented with the[such]
person at the hospital do not comply with the provisions of this chapter or if the
hospital[it] does not receive notification of the order of involuntary hospitalization
as required by this chapter.
Page 4 of 4
BR145500.100 - 1455 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:17 PM Jacketed